Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 3
HAZARDOUS WASTE

Cross references.

- Regulation of transportation, storage, and disposal of pesticides and pesticide containers,

§

2-7-106

.

Regulation of storage, handling, and transportation of gasoline, liquefied petroleum gases, anhydrous ammonia, and other flammable or hazardous substances,

§

25-2-16

.

General power of Department of Human Resources and county boards of health to prevent environmental conditions which, if permitted to develop or continue, would endanger public health, T. 31, C. 12.

Permits for disposal of radioactive waste,

§

31-13-7

.

Regulation of transportation of radioactive materials, liquefied natural gas, and polychlorinated biphenyl, T. 46, C. 11.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Hazardous waste management, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-11.

Law reviews.

-
For survey article on constitutional law, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 53 (1982). For survey article on environment, natural resources, and land use, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 145 (1982). For article, "The Resource Conservation and Recovery Act (RCRA) and the Georgia Solid Waste Management Act," see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 569 (1987). For article, "The Installation Restoration Programs (IRP): Georgia's Perspective," see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 665 (1987).